BFN 

<F P=106> [Hebei Provincial Government Work Report delivered by </F>
Governor Ye Liansong at second session of eighth Hebei 
Provincial People's Congress on 25 February] 
  [Text] Fellow Deputies: 
  On behalf of the Hebei Provincial Government, I now submit a 
report on the work of the government for you members of the 
provincial Committee of the Chinese People's Political 
Consultative Conference [CPPCC] and other members attending this 
session as observers, to examine, approve, comment and make 
suggestions upon. 
<H5>  1. Review of the Work in 1993 </H5>
  In 1993, under the correct leadership of the party Central 
Committee, the State Council, and the provincial party 
committee, the provincial government led the people across the 
province to conscientiously implement Comrade Deng Xiaoping's 
theory on building socialism with Chinese characteristics and 
the guidelines of the 14th party congress, acted in close 
connection with the general objective of building a economically 
strong province, seized the opportunity, deepened reform, 
expanded opening up, accelerated development, achieved 
gratifying achievements in economic construction, reform, 
opening up, and all social undertakings, and basically fulfilled 
all tasks defined by the first session of the eighth provincial 
people's congress. 
  We always persisted in taking economic construction as the 
central task, comprehensively organized people to implement the 
"outlines for invigorating Hebei's economy," and noticeably 
accelerated the pace in building an economically strong 
province. In 1993, the gross domestic products of the province 
were valued at 156 billion yuan, up 16.5 percent over the 
previous year -- a year with the quickest rate of increase since 
reform and opening up. The financial revenue reached 14.39 
billion yuan, up 44.4 percent, basically striking a balance 
between revenue and expenditure. Despite many years of natural 
disasters, there were fairly good harvests. The total output of 
grain during the year reached 23.802 million tonnes, up 8.9 
percent over the previous year, the best record in history; that 
of oil-bearing crops, 805,000 tonnes, up 21.4 percent; and that 
of meats, vegetables, and preserved and fresh fruits all 
increased by a fairly large margin. Affected by various 
factors, cotton suffered a fairly big decline in production, and 
the total output only reached 192 million tonnes, a decline of 
37.1 percent from the previous year. Township enterprises 
developed quite rapidly, and their total output value reached 
171 billion yuan, up 65.5 percent over the previous year; the 
amount of profits totalled 20.1 billion yuan, up 59.8 percent; 
and the amount of taxes handed over to the state reached 3.4 
billion yuan, up 37.7 percent. In industrial production, we 
strived to overcome the "bottleneck" restrictions in funds, 
power, and transportation, succeeded in simultaneously 
increasing the rate and efficiency, and fulfilled the objective 
of "increasing industrial output value, the fixed asset value, 
and profits and taxes so as to move the province one place 
forward in the country." The annual industrial output value 
reached 260 billion yuan, up 29.4 percent over the previous 
year; and the added value of industry reached 75.4 billion yuan, 
up 23 percent. Of this, the output value of industrial units at 
and above the township level reached 162.51 billion yuan, up 
17.8 percent; and that of large and medium-sized enterprises, 
87.71 billion yuan, up 11.2 percent. The industrial economic 
efficiency was noticeably enhanced. The overall index of 
economic efficiency of industrial units at and above the 
township level across the province, exercising independent 
economic accounting, reached 94.9 percent, up 10.4 percentage 
point over the previous year. The "dragon-tiger plan," and the 
plan on grasping the "development in six aspects," were 
comprehensively implemented, and industry and product mix were 
further optimized. The development of tertiary industry was 
accelerated. The volume of goods transported by all means of 
transportation increased 4.3 percent; in post and 
telecommunications, the objective of installing an urban 
telephone with a capacity of 1 million lines was fulfilled ahead 
of schedule, and counties (cities) across the province entered 
the national telephone automation network. Urban and rural 
markets were brisk. The retail sales of social commodities 
across the province reached 57.7 billion yuan, up 16.1 percent 
over the previous year; the overall commodity retail price level 
rose 10.5 percent, lower than the national increase average by 2 
percentage points. Overly rapid population growth was 
controlled. The whole province's natural population growth rate 
was 9.17 per thousand, under the 12.7 per thousand target for 
controlled growth. The living standards of urban and rural 
residents steadily improved. The per capita income for living 
expenses of the urban and rural residents across the province 
went up by 24.9 percent from the previous year, and the average 
per-capita income of peasants rose 17.8 percent, showing an 
increase of 8.2 percent and 2.9 percent respectively if the rise 
in prices was factored in. The production and living conditions 
in poverty-stricken areas improved. Last year, some 745,000 
poor households received support, and the food and clothing 
issues of 415,000 households were resolved. 
  Firmly aiming at the general goal of establishing the 
socialist market economy system and focusing on enterprise 
reform, we promoted reform in various fields in a coordinated 
manner to continuously facilitate the liberation and development 
of productive forces. Under the leadership of the provincial 
party committee, we successfully completed the important reform 
of the administrative system to merge 12 cities and prefectures 
last year, thus by and large putting an end to the regional 
pattern in which cities and prefectures existed simultaneously 
and urban and rural areas were separated and providing favorable 
conditions for the development of the market economy. 
Enterprise reform was notably expedited. By thoroughly 
implementing the "enterprise law" and the "regulations," we paid 
close attention to ensure delegation of the 14 decision- making 
powers to enterprises, exerted great efforts to check wanton 
collection of fares, fines, and donations, organized 1,000 
enterprises to appraise government departments, and promoted the 
change of government functions. The operating mechanism was 
notably transformed in 32 percent of Hebei's local budgetary 
industrial enterprises and 50 percent of its large and 
medium-sized state-owned commodity distribution enterprises, and 
the enterprises were greatly invigorated. Experiment with the 
shareholding system made new headway. Approval was given to 306 
enterprises to try out the shareholding system, and the Huayao 
and Weiyuan shareholding companies were successfully organized 
to issue shares to the public. Establishment of the market 
system was accelerated. In particular, the markets for labor 
forces, technology, information, and other essential elements of 
productions developed by leaps and bounds. Establishment of the 
market intermediary organizations was intensified to effectively 
increase the market force in the national economy. 
  We continued to take opening to the outside world as the 
important measure for building an economically strong province 
and made a substantial step in opening to the outside world. 
The provincial government held two provincial foreign economic 
and trade activities outside the border, winning new progress in 
using foreign capital. A notable characteristic was the 
extension of use of foreign capital from ordinary processing 
projects to energy, transportation, and other basic industry and 
infrastructural projects, from ordinary small projects to large 
and medium-sized construction projects, and from imports of cash 
to renovation of old enterprises. Last year, Hebei used $480 
million in foreign funds, of which $360 million was direct 
foreign investment, an increase of 68.6 and 100 percent, 
respectively, over the preceding year. Newly registered three 
types of foreign-funded enterprises totaled 1,879, an increase 
of 44.4 percent. Five hundred new foreign-funded enterprises of 
the three types were established to bring the total number to 
1,007. Last year, the three types of foreign-funded enterprises 
created 6.7 billion yuan in output value, earned $170 million 
through exports, and paid 210 million yuan in taxes, up 158, 
137.2, and 160 percent, respectively, from the preceding year. 
Our annual volume of exports totaled $1.99 billion, up 11.4 
percent from the preceding year, of which the exports through 
ordinary trade and the exports by the three types of 
foreign-funded enterprises totaled $1.59 billion, up 12.9 
percent. Substantial progress was made in opening to domestic 
areas, with 3,066 contracts for economic and technological 
cooperation signed and 2.25 billion yuan brought in, up 17.7 and 
80 percent, respectively. 
  We conscientiously implemented the series of policy measures 
of the party Central Committee and the State Council for 
strengthening and improving macroeconomic regulation and 
control, thus bringing about a notable turn for the better in 
financial and economic order. Illegal inter-bank lending and 
collection of funds were checked, and people's savings deposits 
increased. Development zones and real estate business developed 
in a healthy manner thanks to efforts in examination and 
rectification. Funds for state and provincial key construction 
projects, for circulating funds of key enterprises, and for the 
purchase of farm and sideline products were guaranteed. By the 
end of last year, Hebei had recalled 1.73 billion yuan in 
illegal inter-bank lending and cleaned up 136 illegal monetary 
organizations. Savings deposits of monetary organizations 
throughout the province totaled 140.6 billion yuan, up 24.48 
billion yuan from the amount registered at the beginning of the 
year, and their loans totaled 143.17 billion yuan, up 25.22 
billion yuan, which effectively supported industrial and 
agricultural production and construction undertakings. As has 
been proven in practice, the central measures for strengthening 
and improving macroeconomic regulation and control were very 
necessary and correct. 
  We made unremitting efforts to reasonably increase input, 
accelerate the construction of key projects, and enhanced the 
reserve strength for national economic development. Last year, 
the investment in fixed assets of society was 54 billion yuan, 
an increase of 60.8 percent over the previous year. Of this, 
the investment of state-owned units was 31.03 billion yuan, an 
increase of 54.8 percent. Of the investment of state-owned 
units, the investment in local capital construction was 11.35 
billion yuan and that in technological transformation was 7.51 
billion yuan, respectively increasing by 83.1 percent and 36.6 
percent. The construction of key projects was accelerated. As 
of the end of last year, the province invested 9.7 billion yuan 
in 149 continued projects and new projects and 41 projects were 
completed and went into operation. Thus, the reserve strength 
for economic development was enhanced. 
  We made efforts to promote the combination of science and 
technology and education with the economy and further brought 
into play the functions of science and technology and education 
for promoting economic development. Positive achievements were 
made in launching the campaign of scientific and technological 
progress. The province gained 1,082 scientific and technological 
findings at or above the provincial and departmental levels. 
Some of these findings attained the international and domestic 
advanced levels. Two hundred and seventy-nine new 
high-technology enterprises and 472 new high-technology products 
were approved and acknowledged. Education steadily developed. 
Twenty counties in the province basically popularized nine-year 
compulsory education. Sixty county-level vocational education 
centers were basically built. Higher education developed in the 
course of reform. Institutions of higher learning paid 
attention to readjusting the specialized subjects, optimized the 
specialized structure, added and readjusted 47 specialized 
courses, and increased the proportion of specialized courses 
directly serving economic construction. 
  We constantly put the spiritual civilization and the setup 
of 
democracy and legal system in an important position and 
comprehensively promoted social progress. Cultural undertakings 
became more prosperous. We successfully sponsored the fourth 
China Wuqiao international acrobatic art festival, introduced a 
number of fine works of art, and won 93 awards at national and 
international art contests. The urban and rural areas further 
strengthened the health work and made new improvements in 
medical quality. The provincial delegation made good results at 
the seventh national sports meet, where the provincial teams 
ranked the province 10th. New headway was made in press, 
publication, radio, film, and television, environmental 
protection, foreign affairs, tourist, overseas affairs, 
nationalities affairs, religion, cultural relics, archives, and 
local chronicles. The governments at various levels consciously 
accepted legal supervision and work supervision by the people's 
congresses and democratic supervision by the CPPCC 
organizations; made efforts to improve the quality of handling 
deputies' suggestions, criticisms, and opinions and CPPCC 
members' motions; and handled, within the legal time limit, 
1,260 suggestions and motions as set forth at the first session 
of the eighth provincial people's congress and the first session 
of the seventh provincial CPPCC committee and submitted by the 
National Peoples' Congress and the National CPPCC Committee. 
Last year, the provincial government drafted, revised, and 
formulated 51 local rules and administrative regulations and 
ensured the timely promulgation of a group of legislative items 
needed by reform, opening up, and the development of the 
socialist market economy. We strengthened the improvement of 
administrative honesty and made achievements in opposing 
corruption. The government organizations across the province 
launched various kinds of special inspections; conscientiously 
straightened out the unhealthy trends of wantonly collecting 
funds, wantonly apportioning expenses, and wantonly asking for 
charges; corrected the unhealthy trends within trades; and 
investigated and handled major and appalling cases. As of the 
end of last year, the procuratorial organs across the province 
filed 2,840 cases of cadres violating disciplines and revised 
and canceled 294 items of collecting charges and imposing fines 
as defined by the provincial organs themselves. Thus, social 
order was further strengthened. A total of 47,451 criminal 
cases were cracked, including 13,612 major cases. This 
effectively attacked the arrogance of the criminal offenders and 
safeguarded social order. New achievements were made in 
supporting the Army and giving preferential treatment to 
families of revolutionary martyrs and servicemen and supporting 
the government and cherishing the people. Five cities in the 
province were named as state-level model cities advanced in the 
double-support work; and 35 counties (cities) were named 
provincial-level model cities (counties). There were 6,500 
Army-civilian joint civility centers. All this helped promote 
the improvement of the spiritual and material civilizations. 
  Fellow deputies: The first year in the tenure of the 
present provincial people's government is 1993. Various 
achievements scored by the province in reform, opening up, 
economic construction, and socialist undertakings in the year 
are the outcomes made by the broad masses of cadres and people 
on various fronts across the province in being keen on making 
progress, in engaging in labor work industriously, and in 
uniting as one in waging struggle under the correct leadership 
of the CPC Central Committee, the State Council, and the 
provincial party committee. Hereby, on behalf of the provincial 
people's government I would like to extend lofty respect and 
heartfelt thanks to the broad masses of workers, peasants, 
cadres, and intellectuals throughout the province; to the broad 
masses of officers and soldiers of the People's Liberation Army 
[PLA] units stationed in the province and of cadres and 
policemen of the provincial armed police forces; to various 
democratic parties and nonparty personages; to the compatriots 
of Hong Kong, Macao, and Taiwan, as well as overseas Chinese, 
who have made contributions to the province's development; and 
to both domestic and foreign friends who have supported the 
province's construction and development in various undertakings. 
  While fully acknowledging the achievements, we have clearly 
seen that the province still has some shortcomings and problems 
in accelerating its economic development and building itself 
into a strong economic province. As compared with the advanced 
and coastal provinces the province has greatly lagged behind, 
though it has accelerated its economic development. The 
structural contradiction of the economy is prominent. As 
compared with the secondary industry, the development of primary 
and tertiary industries is relatively backward. The economic 
results of a large number of enterprises are poor. The rate of 
industrial products in markets is low. The proportion of 
nonstate-run enterprises is smaller. The restriction imposed by 
the "bottleneck" is still more serious. The situation in funds, 
power, and transportation is strained. The shortage of raw 
materials, including cotton, is larger. The dynamics added to 
opening up is not enough and the pace in development is not 
fast. The integration between science, technology, and the 
economy is not close enough. The rate of turning the scientific 
and technological results into productive forces is low. The 
public security of some localities is not satisfactory and the 
people lack a sense of security. A small number of employees 
in the people's governments are committing the problems of 
corruption, formalism, and bureaucracy, which are adversely 
affecting the close relationship between the masses and the 
government. As for these problems, we should adopt realistic 
effective measures to handle them earnestly. 
<H5>  2. The Guiding Ideology and Fighting Targets of 1994 Work </H5>
  This year the province will continuously maintain a fine 
trend of development based on achieving rapid economic 
development over the past two years, and will be an important 
year in which the province will push forward the overall reform 
in the economic systems and will accelerate the establishment of 
socialist market economic systems, and a crucial year in which 
the province will successfully fulfill the "Eighth Five-Year 
Plan" and strive to prefulfill the target of quadrupling the 
gross national product. The guiding ideology of the government 
work this year is as follows: By regarding as a guide Comrade 
Deng Xiaoping's theory of building socialism with Chinese 
characteristics and the party's basic line, we should earnestly 
implement the spirit of the 14th CPC Congress and the spirit of 
the Third Plenary Session of the 14th CPC Central Committee; as 
well as unite as one, overcome the difficulties, and accelerate 
the establishment of socialist market economic systems according 
to the principle of seizing the opportunity, deepening the 
reform, broadening the opening up, promoting the development, 
maintaining the stability, and building Hebei into a strong 
economic province. Efforts should be made to open more markets; 
to readjust the structure; to increase economic results; to have 
the province's national economy achieve sustained, rapid, and 
sound development; to safeguard the political stability and 
social peace; and to promote overall progress in the society. 
  In line with the above mentioned guiding ideology, major 
targets set for economic and social development in the province 
this year are as follows: 
  The gross national product should show an over 11 percent 
increase over 1993. Of this increase, that of added value in 
primary industry will be 4 percent; that in secondary industry, 
over 14 percent; and that in tertiary industry, over 14 percent. 
  The investments made in the fixed assets of society as a 
whole will be 61 billion yuan and show a 13 percent increase 
over 1993. Of these investments, those made by the state-owned 
units will be 34.9 billion yuan and show a 12.5 percent increase 
over 1993 and the rate of investments will reach 32 percent. 
  Calculated in terms of the new tax assignment system and 
financial system, the local financial revenues should reach 8.03 
billion yuan, up 7.9 percent. All sorts of savings deposits of 
banks should be 17 billion yuan, up 17 percent, and all kinds of 
loans should increase by 22 billion yuan, up 20.9 percent. 
  The actual use of foreign capital should reach $600 million, 
up 25 percent; the total volume of foreign export trade should 
be $2.16 billion yuan, up 8.5 percent; the export of ordinary 
trade and the three types of foreign-funded enterprises should 
be $1.83 billion yuan, up 15 percent. 
  The total retail sales of commodities should increase 16 
percent, and efforts should be made to control the rise in the 
retail prices of commodities within 10 percent. 
  The average per capita income for living expenses of urban 
residents across the province should reach 2,600 yuan, up 18.6 
percent; the net income of peasants should reach 900 yuan, up 12 
percent. 
  We must guarantee that the natural population growth rate 
will not exceed 12 per thousand, and strive to control it within 
10.85 per thousand. 
  The aforementioned objective is proposed after analyzing the 
conditions in various sectors in the province and through 
repeated estimates and calculations and meets the demand of the 
"outline for invigorating Hebei's economy," and is 
forward-looking and feasible, allowing a certain flexibility. 
During our practical work, we should strive to fulfill it in a 
better manner in line with the objective of building an 
economically strong province. 
  There are many favorable conditions for doing this year's 
work well. This year the state will issue more reform measures 
and make the biggest strides in reform. This will accelerate the 
process of marketization of economic development, gradually 
improve the relations in various economic sectors, further 
improve macroeconomic environment, and instill new vitality into 
national economic development. With our unceasing efforts to 
consolidate and improve macroeconomic regulation and control, 
the economic order will be better. Over the past few years, 
Hebei Province has successively maintained a rational increase 
in the investment in fixed assets, completed and commissioned a 
number of new projects, formed a new production capacity, 
unceasingly strengthened its economic development momentum, and 
laid a certain material foundation for realizing a sustained and 
rapid economic development. The international and domestic 
environments are very favorable for us to continuously expand 
opening up. The issuance of the central policy decision on the 
development strategy of opening up areas around Bohai Bay has 
enhanced Hebei's attraction of foreign investments. 
Particularly, the further ideological emancipation of the broad 
masses of cadres across the province has formed a strong joint 
force for implementing the "outline," developing the economy, 
and building an economically strong province. Actually, we have 
faced a hard-earned good opportunity for reform, opening up, and 
economic development. Meanwhile, we should also recognize that 
there are still many contradictions and difficulties on our road 
of advancement. Along with the deepening of reform and the 
readjustments involving the interests of various sectors, some 
new situations and new problems will also emerge. There are also 
some destabilizing factors in society. During the current 
economic development, the "bottleneck" restrictions, such as 
funds, energy, communications, and transportation, have remained 
prominent. Along with the price readjustment of energy, raw 
materials, and communications, the production cost has 
increased, and the difficulty in enhancing economic efficiency 
has aggravated. As a major textile industrial province, Hebei 
has faced the difficult problem in cotton production and supply. 
We must not lower our guard in these contradictions and 
difficulties, and must pay full attention to them. Judging from 
the general situation, we have more favorable factors than 
unfavorable ones, if we compare the former with the latter. As 
long as we persist in viewing the overall situation in line with 
Comrade Deng Xiaoping's theory on building socialism with 
Chinese characteristics and the party's basic line; further 
emancipate the mind under the leadership of the party Central 
Committee, the State Council, and the provincial party 
committee; unceasingly renew concepts; always persist in taking 
economic construction as the central task; unite as one; enhance 
spirit; advance despite difficulties; work in a down-to-earth 
manner; and unswervingly act in line with the objective defined 
in the "outline," we will surely resolve and overcome all sorts 
of contradictions and difficulties on our road of advancement, 
and unceasingly push Hebei's reform, opening up, economic 
construction, and all undertakings forward. 
<H5>  3. Accelerate Reform in the Province as a Whole by Upholding </H5>
the Integration Between Pushing Forward Reform in an Overall Way 
and Making a Breakthrough in Key Fields 
  The "decision on the several issues of establishing the 
systems of socialist market economy," which has been adopted at 
the Third Plenary Session of the 14 CPC Central Committee, has 
defined the basic frame of the socialist market economy; drawn 
up an overall blueprint; and pointed out the direction and tasks 
for the country to conduct reform in the economy in the coming 
period. In line with the central arrangements, we should deepen 
the reform and make a reform breakthrough in multiple fields 
this year. We should actively deepen the reform in rural areas 
by emphasizing the tasks of shifting the mechanism; establishing 
the modern enterprise systems; accelerating the reform in the 
managerial systems of finance and tax, banking, planning, 
investments, fund raising, foreign trade, and commodity prices; 
and the task of making concerted efforts to push forward the 
reform in the systems of socialist market economy and public 
security. In line with the state overall arrangements, we must 
concentrate our efforts on earnestly doing a good job in 
grasping the reform and ensuring the fulfillment of various 
tasks in reform. 
  We should accelerate the shifting of business mechanisms of 
the state-owned enterprises and actively probe an effective way 
to establish modern enterprise systems. This represents a basic 
demand for establishing the systems of socialist market economy, 
a central link of the reform in the economic systems as a whole, 
and also an emphasis or difficult point of reform. In line with 
the tasks of boosting the large- and medium-sized enterprises 
and reinforcing the dynamics of reform, we should be greatly 
determined this year to achieve new and practical progress in 
the following several links: First, efforts should be made to 
continuously implement the "enterprise law" and "regulations" 
and to delegate to the letter various rights and duties to 
enterprises. Second, efforts should be made to continuously 
perfect various business styles that have been proved effective 
and to urge enterprises to shift their business mechanisms. We 
should strive to have 50 percent of the state-owned enterprises 
shift their operation mechanisms this year. We should continue 
to deepen the reform in the systems of labor and personnel 
affairs and distributions, to prefect the internal systems of 
enterprises, and to reinforce the vigor of enterprises. Third, 
a good job should be done in carefully grasping the pilot work 
of establishing modern enterprise systems. Except for 
successfully organizing the units assigned by the state for the 
pilot work, the province as a whole should assign 100 
enterprises to take up the pilot work in this regard to enable 
the enterprises that have taken up the pilot work to truly 
become modern ones with clear property rights, clear division 
between right and duties, separation between political work and 
enterprise management, and scientific management. We should also 
enable these enterprises to play a leading or model role in 
encouraging the state-owned enterprises to shift their operation 
mechanism. Fourth, efforts should be made to actively push 
forward the reform in the property right systems by emphasizing 
reform of shareholding systems. As for the large- and 
medium-sized enterprises that have scored good economic results 
and have been strong in the competitive capability, as well as 
the core enterprises of enterprise groups, we should reform them 
in line with their different conditions into limited liability 
companies or limited liability stock companies with the 
participation of corporate shares. Some of them may be 
reformed into companies with the only share of state funds. We 
should take up the pilot work of reforming or reorganizing 200 
enterprises into shareholding ones this year and strive to 
reform 300. As for a number of small state- owned enterprises 
and money-losing medium-sized enterprises, we should vigorously 
enforce among them various property managerial styles, such as 
the state ownership and management by individuals, the public 
ownership and management by individuals, the lease of 
enterprises, the entrustment of business, and sale or the 
transfer of business or production. As for some enterprises 
that cannot pay their debts and those that have no hope to 
switch their losses to profits, we should have them become 
bankrupt in line with the provisions of the "bankrupt law". In 
conducting reform in the property right systems, we should 
establish or improve the mechanism of property right supervision 
to ensure the value reserve and increase of the state assets. 
  We should actively push forward the reform in the systems of 
finance and tax, banking, planning, investments, fund raising, 
and commodity prices and establish or improve the province's 
system of conducting macro readjustment and control. In 
conducting reform in the financial and tax systems, the state 
has enforced the financial system of assigning taxes to 
provinces beginning 1 January this year. The province will also 
enforce the financial managerial system of assigning taxes to 
cities and prefectures. The general guiding ideology and 
principles in this regard are as follows: We should accurately 
make distributions between the province and the cities and 
prefectures. We should not only consider the vested financial 
resources of all localities and mobilize the enthusiasm of the 
governments at various levels for developing the economy, 
increasing revenues, and reducing expenses, but also ensure the 
stable increase in the provincial-level financial resources and 
safeguard the provincial level's necessary regulation and 
control abilities. We should reasonably define the affairs 
rights of the province and the cities and prefectures. In line 
with the principle of linking affairs rights with financial 
rights, the affairs that are related to the province as a whole 
and should concentratively be managed by the province should be 
managed by provincial-level finance. As for the affairs that 
are suitable for the management of cities and prefectures, the 
affairs rights and the financial rights should relevantly be 
delegated to cities and prefectures. In line with the principle 
of management by various levels according to unified policies, 
we should balance the financial distributions between the 
province and the cities and prefectures. On the basis of 
basically maintaining the distribution patterns as defined in 
the current financial system, we should separate central and 
local taxation systems. We should strictly enforce financial 
and economic disciplines and ensure the smooth progress of this 
reform. Simultaneously, we should also conscientiously separate 
the state tax bureau from the local tax bureaus and make good 
connections of their work. In the course of replacing the old 
systems by the new, we should exert great efforts to attend to 
the tax collection and management work and the work of handing 
over taxes to the finance to ensure the fulfillment of tax 
collection and revenue tasks. In the principle of tightly 
arranging expenditures, we should harden the restrictions of the 
budget. No financial departments at various levels are allowed 
to have deficit arrangements. It is necessary to reform the 
monetary system. According to the state-fixed orientation, 
targets, tasks for reforming the monetary system and the general 
principles governing the monetary work, we should continue to 
consolidate the monetary order, steadily promote the monetary 
reform, strictly control the aggregate of credits, and 
realistically strengthen the monetary supervision and 
management. To suit the demands of setting up the monetary 
organizational system and the monetary market system, we should 
strive to gain the state approvals to set up various categories 
of monetary organizations and positively develop nonbanking 
monetary organizations, such as capital circulation leasing 
companies, credit investment companies, and financial affairs 
companies. To suit the demands that specialized banks should 
engage in the management of the proportions of assets and 
liabilities, we should vigorously organize savings deposits, 
stabilize the sources of funds for credits, and positively 
support the province's reasonably financial needs for economic 
construction. To suit the new situation of separating commercial 
banks from policy-lending banks, we should strengthen enterprise 
management, increase returns on use of capital, enhance 
enterprises' capability for returning loans, and enjoy the 
support of the commercial banks. We should strengthen the 
pre-phase preparatory work for the projects that should be 
supported out of the policy consideration, make increasingly 
more projects be listed in the state plan, and strive to gain 
the support of the policy-lending banks. It is necessary to 
reform the planning system. To suit the demands for the 
development of the socialist market economic system, we should 
gradually set up a new-type guidance planning system and better 
bring into play planning functions for regulation and control, 
balance, guiding orientation, and service. It is necessary to 
reform the investment and capital circulation systems. 
According to the state requirements for dividing the categories 
of basic investment projects, competition investment projects, 
and public welfare investment projects, some basic projects 
should be covered in the state capital arrangement plan and 
supported by the state development plans, enterprises should 
actively keep connections with banks and gain the support of the 
financial departments to develop the competition projects, the 
financial departments at various levels across the province 
should make investment in public welfare projects, and 
simultaneously, we should positively strive to gain the support 
of the state to develop the projects of this category. It is 
necessary to reform the price system. The state decided to rise 
the prices of such basic products as crude oil, electricity, and 
cotton. We should adopt effective measures to ensure the smooth 
progress of the reform in these aspects and to strictly prevent 
arbitrary price hikes. In regard to the price changes that are 
related to the benefits of each and every household, we should 
judge the hour and size up the situation, take into full 
consideration the bearing capability of the masses, and 
carefully work out measures for price reform. As for the key 
commodities that have a bearing on the people's livelihood, we 
should set up a reserve system and a risk fund system, perfect a 
mechanism for regulating the circulation of commodities, and 
control market prices. It is necessary to strengthen the 
management of market prices and maintain the stability of market 
prices. We should resolutely deal blows to the activities of 
manufacturing and marketing fake and poor quality products to 
safeguard the interests of consumers. Simultaneously, we should 
also grasp the media orientation and accurately guide 
consumption. 
  Fellow deputies! The general task of this year's work is 
to seize the opportunity, deepen reform, expand opening up, 
promote development, and maintain stability. All fields and all 
items of work should submit and gear themselves to this general 
task and conscientiously handle the relations among reform, 
development, and stability. Reform and opening up are the 
motivation to promote development, development is the foundation 
of social stability, and stability is the essential condition 
for reform and development. In the process of firmly and 
unswervingly promoting reform and establishing the socialist 
market economic structure, we must decide on the various steps 
of reform and judge their success or failure by adhering to the 
criterion of whether they help promote economic development. We 
must attach high importance on and appropriately resolve all 
sorts of contradictions and problems emerging in reform. We must 
positively and appropriately readjust the relations between the 
interests of all sectors and the pattern of interest. We must 
strengthen the research of public opinions and the feelings of 
the masses and master in a timely manner the changes in the 
people's concept of value, spiritual mood, and spiritual state. 
We must do a good job to reduce social upheavals and strengthen 
the monitoring of, the analysis of, and the pre-warning of 
economic trends to ensure the smooth progress of reform and 
development. Governments at all levels must firmly embrace the 
sense of the whole, consciously safeguard the unity, 
seriousness, and effectiveness of policies and decrees issued by 
the CPC Central Committee and the State Council. Leaders at all 
levels should concentrate even more energies on reform, and, for 
some major reform measures, experiments should be made first 
before they are popularized. Experiments should be bold and 
popularization should be prudent. We should not only make 
overall arrangements and give meticulous guidance to ensure that 
the reform will proceed in a coordinated manner, but also seize 
the opportunity of reform and have a good command of key links 
to make breakthroughs in major areas in order to constantly 
deepen the package reform and ensure the success in all reform 
measures. 
<H5>  4. Strive To Promote Sustained, Rapid, and Sound </H5>
Development of the Provincial Economy 
  Closely around the general goal of optimizing structure, 
improving efficiency, promoting development, and building an 
economically strong province, the 1994 economic work should be 
focused on the work in the following six aspects: 
  A. We should actually attend to agricultural and rural work, 
with emphasis on making the people well-off. 
  Agriculture, rural areas, and peasants are the fundamental 
issues of China's economic development and modernization. This 
year, agricultural and rural work should be aimed at 
continuously implementing the guidelines of the central and the 
provincial rural work conferences, stabilizing the party's basic 
policies toward rural areas, deepening the rural reform, making 
positive explorations for resolving the conspicuous 
contradictions and problems cropping up in the development of 
rural economy, and further strengthening the position of 
agriculture as the foundation of the national economy. We 
should focus all the work on building better-off villages, 
townships, and counties to promote the all-around development of 
the rural economy and increase peasants' income. 
  Under the prerequisite of ensuring the steady increase of 
output of major agricultural products, we should optimize the 
agricultural structure under the guidance of markets. Grain 
production should be continuously aimed at increasing the per 
unit output. The annual total grain output should range from 23 
million tonnes to 23.5 million tonnes. Cotton production has 
already dropped to the bottom, and hence efforts should be made 
to pick it up. To this end, we should increase cotton growing 
acreage on a large scale, increase its per unit yield, 
resolutely implement the 10 measures of the provincial 
government on promoting this year's cotton production, and 
actually pay attention to cotton production in line with the 
tasks and goals defined by the cotton production responsibility 
letters. We should further increase the investment in 
agriculture, build well the grain and cotton base counties that 
are decided by the state, and give full play to these bases key 
role in increasing output. 
  We should strengthen the popularization of agricultural 
science and technology and actively popularize and apply 
agricultural technology to increase production. It is necessary 
to unremittingly carry out farmland capital construction, do a 
good job in building projects on "saving water, drilling wells, 
storing water, and diverting water to Hebei," increase the water 
irrigated areas by 2.27 million mu, and improve 4.17 million mu 
of water- saving irrigated areas. We should make real efforts 
to conduct agricultural comprehensive development projects and 
to strive to raise the ability to combat natural disasters. On 
the premise of guaranteeing the stable increase in such basic 
agricultural products as grain and cotton, we should actively 
readjust the structure of agriculture and the rural economy, 
accelerate the change of agriculture into "high-yield, fine 
quality, and highly efficient farming," and accelerate the 
seven-character project on "water conservation, vegetables, 
afforestation, crop cultivation, cattle raising, fishery, and 
production of leading products," and the "double thousand 
project" in grain fields. Continued efforts should be made to 
build the rural socialized service system and guide peasants 
into the market. In line with the demand of industrialization, 
and on the basis of developing leading industries and key 
products, we should establish a production management system of 
integrating crop cultivation with breeding industry and 
processing industry, marketing with production and supply, 
domestic trade with foreign trade, and agriculture with industry 
and commerce, and enable staple agricultural and sideline 
products enter the market or be converted to increase value. 
  We should actively develop township enterprises. Township 
enterprises are the main pillars of the rural economy. We 
should uphold the principle of adopting various ownership forms 
and systems; accelerating development; and making improvements 
steadily, making the annual development rate of township 
enterprises across the province reach or surpass the national 
average; simultaneously increasing profits, tax delivery, and 
the development rate; and relatively transferring the 
agricultural surplus labor forces. We should continue to 
implement the strategy on developing township enterprises around 
"Bohai Bay, Beijing and Tianjin Municipalities, railways," make 
breakthroughs in key areas, and carry out this work orderly. 
Counties, (cities, districts) along "Bohai Bay, Beijing and 
Tianjin, and railways," in particular, should achieve a higher 
development rate and economic efficiency than the provincial 
average. 
  We should select a number of enterprises, include them in 
plans at all levels, support them on a priority basis, and 
establish a batch of key township enterprises and enterprise 
groups of a large scale, high level, and good efficiency that 
are export oriented. Under the new situation in which reform of 
state-owned enterprises is being unceasingly deepened and 
foreign-funded enterprises are being rapidly developed, we 
should accelerate the change of township enterprise operational 
mechanisms, actively popularize the shareholding cooperative 
system, and enhance the competitive capacity of township 
enterprises. It is necessary to accelerate the building of 
small industrial areas and small towns, establish the incentive 
mechanism for county, township, and village cadres, link the 
development of township enterprises with the achievements of 
cadres, and give strict evaluation, awards, and punishment. 
  We should continue to reduce the burdens of peasants and 
deeply conduct the work on supporting and developing the poor 
areas. Reducing the burdens of peasants is a policy measure for 
protecting the production enthusiasm of peasants and an 
effective way for increasing the income of peasants. We should 
continue to implement a series of policy stipulations of the 
state and Hebei Province on reducing the burdens of peasants and 
further resolve the problem of the rural areas on the 
unwarranted pooling of funds, arbitrary requisition of donations 
and exaction of fees. Based on investigation and study, we 
should further formulate and improve policies and measures for 
supporting the development of less-developed areas and adopt 
essential special policies to accelerate economic development in 
these areas. This year, the province as a whole should resolve 
the food and clothing problems of 300,000 poverty-stricken 
households. Persistent efforts should be made to develop and 
help the poor areas, and strive to realize the goal that every 
person will basically have an average of one or half a mu of 
field which gives stable and high yields irrespective of drought 
or water-logging within a short period of time. On this basis, 
we should develop township enterprises and regional pillar 
industries in line with local conditions, develop industries in 
other localities, export labor service, and strive to raise the 
average per capita income of the people. Beginning this year, 
we should resolve the problems of 2,000 villages with 
exceptional difficulties by groups, organize some large- and 
medium-sized enterprises in the province, some cities under the 
jurisdiction of the provincial government and provincial-level 
departments, colleges and universities, and scientific research 
units to help these villages, formulate development plans, and 
give support to the counterparts. We should increase the input 
of funds, materials, science, and technology in these poor areas 
and help them train personnel. Through unremitting efforts, we 
may greatly improve the outlook of the poor areas in our 
province. 
  We should solidly attend to the rural family planning work. 
Our province's family planning task is extremely arduous. The 
rural areas should put the focus of the family planning work on 
the grass roots, the basic work, the implementation of the 
rules, the workers contingents, and the solid work. It is 
necessary to strengthen the management of family planning 
according to laws and resolutely eliminate the serious phenomena 
that some counties, townships, and villages are weak in their 
basic family planning work and poor in management, employ 
trickery, and give birth to two or more children. According to 
the requirements that party and government top leaders 
personally engage in and assume sole responsibility for the 
management of family planning and the principal leaders 
realistically grasp the management of family planning, we should 
conscientiously implement the system of responsibility for 
management of population quotas and strictly implement the 
system that all achievements will be negated if family planning 
is not successfully grasped. Leaders of the counties (cities) 
where family planning work is backward and many problems exist 
should have a stronger sense of responsibility to attend to this 
work and strive to immediately change the passive situation. 
  B. We should optimize the industrial structure and deeply 
launch the activities of "three increases, one decrease, and one 
improvement." 
  This year, we should optimize the industrial product mix 
according to the market demands, increase economic results, and 
continue to maintain a faster industrial growth rate. The 
industrial front should extensively and deeply launch the 
activities of "three increases, one decrease, and one 
improvement" with the main contents of increasing production, 
decreasing deficits, and improving efficiency. That is, the 
increase in the industrial added value should range from 14 to 
17 percent. Of this, the added value of the independent 
accounting industrial enterprises at or above the township level 
should increase from 12 to 15 percent, the profits and taxes 
realized by these enterprises should increase by 10 percent, the 
investment in technological transformation of state-owned units 
should increase by 13.4 percent, the amounts of deficits 
suffered by large and medium-sized industrial enterprises should 
be reduced by 15 percent, and the overall index of the economic 
results realized by the independent accounting industrial 
enterprises at or above the township level should increase by 1 
percentage point and strive to increase by 2 percentage point. 
  The key to persisting in the state industrial policies, 
taking markets as a guidance, and making great efforts to 
readjust the structure is to grasp the readjustment of the 
product mix. The general requirements are as follows: The 
heavy industry should bring into play its role as the basic 
industry, continue to solve the problems relating to the "highly 
efficient heavy industry," and strengthen the reserve strength 
for the province's economic development. The light industry 
should continue to implement the famous-brand strategy and 
persistently make readjustments according to the orientation of 
"high" (new high-technology), "quality" (good quality and famous 
brands,) "large" (efficiency of scale), and "outside" (foreign 
markets). In line with the targets for readjusting the product 
mix, we should accelerate the technological transformation of 
enterprises. From this year, we should concentrate in four 
years to technologically transform, in a well-planned manner, in 
groups, and by stages, all of our province's budgetary 
industrial enterprises. In particular, we should popularize the 
experience gained by "Xuancai" and positively use foreign 
capital to conduct graft transformation among old enterprises. 
This is a key way for changing the enterprise mechanism, 
accelerating the structural readjustment, promoting enterprises 
to stand among the international market, and making up for the 
deficiency in construction funds. This year, the large- and 
medium-sized enterprises and budgetary industrial enterprises 
plan to invite foreign businessmen to develop 1,000 items in the 
province and strive to sign 300 contracts. We should 
comprehensively carry out the "dragon and tiger plan." This 
year, 76 continued and new projects covered in the "dragon and 
tiger plan" should be developed. By the end of this year, we 
should ensure the completion and operation of 40 projects. In 
line with the requirements for developing new products and 
upgrading old products, we should manufacture and develop a 
group of new high-technology products, have pillar industries to 
increase the production of the products with advantages, 
increase a group of products that can create and save foreign 
exchange, have burgeoning industries manufacture a number of 
products, eliminate a group of old products, and upgrade a group 
of new products so as to elevate the province's overall 
industrial quality to a new height. 
  We should grasp the demands of markets and broaden the 
occupation of products in markets. The prominent problem of 
industrial production this year is one relating to markets. We 
should organize a large number of specialists into several 
groups to carry out investigation, study, and calculation on 
markets in line with the difference of various industries and 
trades and to put forward in a timely manner the intermediate- 
and long-term policies to upgrade the capability of coping with 
the future changes of markets. The forefront work of 
enterprises should be placed on markets and all enterprises 
should grasp the work of opening more markets by regarding it as 
an important task. They should foster a business mechanism with 
the rapid feedback of markets, flexible reaction, and the strong 
capability of meeting the change. They should also be able to 
grasp sales to promote production, to increase sales to expand 
production, and to fix production in line with sales. Efforts 
should be made to ensure the sale rate of industrial products 
turned out by enterprises at or above the township level across 
the province to reach 97 percent this year. 
  We should deeply launch the drive of learning from the 
wealthy and influential enterprises and from the Handan Iron and 
Steel Company, grasp the projects conforming with strong 
business trends, create products with competitive capability, 
contend for turning out first-grade products, and strictly 
conduct management and run plants. In line with the demand of 
the market economy, we should vigorously enhance the operation 
and management of enterprises; boldly learn or draw from the 
advanced managerial experience gained by foreign countries; and 
improve the enterprise regulations and rules. We should also 
reinforce the labor discipline, enhance the accounting of cost, 
vigorously grasp the training of staff members and workers, and 
upgrade the technological standards so as to promote enterprises 
to improve their economic targets of products' quality, material 
consumption, economic results, and safe production, to a new 
level. Efforts should be made to grasp the work of encouraging 
enterprises to switch their losses to profits, to emphatically 
conduct the work of encouraging the profit-making enterprises 
whose profits are over 1,000 yuan to further increase their 
profits and the large- and medium-sized enterprises to handle 
their operational losses. As for money-losing enterprises and 
those that have suffered production suspension or 
semi-suspension, we should carry out study on the plants one by 
one and put forward the measures of switching losses to profits 
in line with the local conditions to reduce the number of 
enterprises that have suffered production suspension or 
semi-suspension as much as possible. 
  C. We should vigorously develop tertiary industrial 
enterprise by emphasizing the fostering of market systems. 
  The development of tertiary industrial enterprises 
represents 
an important yardstick in measuring the extent of developing a 
modern socialist economy, an important condition for promoting 
the development of primary and secondary industries, and an 
important resource for increasing local financial revenues. We 
must emphasize in economic development the task of accelerating 
the development of tertiary industrial enterprises and 
concentrate our efforts on grasping the development vigorously 
and successfully. We should earnestly organize the enforcement 
of "Hebei Province's 1991-2000 outline on developing the 
tertiary industry." We should also encourage the state-owned, 
collectively owned, individually owned, privately owned, and 
foreign-funded enterprises, as well as various industries and 
trades, to make concerted efforts in the development according 
to the principles of formulating rational plans, defining the 
emphasis, actively giving guidance, and accelerating the 
development, so as to gradually upgrade the proportion of 
tertiary industry in the national economy. 
  We should regard market establishment as an emphasis or a 
breakthrough in developing the tertiary industry. In line with 
the basic idea of "establishing large markets, developing 
large-scale trade, and enlivening the large-scale circulation," 
we should further develop the markets of means of production 
and consumer goods and uphold the principle of paying 
simultaneous attention to both market development and 
improvement. We should also consolidate, develop, improve, and 
upgrade the existing markets of various commodities. Efforts 
should be made to continuously accelerate the fostering and 
establishing of large specialized and wholesale markets and 
comprehensive wholesale markets. We should put our work 
emphasis on building the 20 large shopping centers of various 
categories, accelerate the fostering and development of markets 
of various essential factors of production, and vigorously 
develop the intermediary organizations of markets. We should 
take a larger step this year in establishing the markets of 
finance, labor forces, talented personnel, technologies, 
information, and property right business. We should establish 
or develop as soon as possible a large number of social 
intermediary organizations, such as an accounting office, 
attorney office, and auditing office; as well as the 
self-discipline organizations of markets, such as industrial and 
economic federation, chamber of commerce, associations of 
various industries and trades, so as to promote the rational 
circulation of essential factors of production and the fair 
competition of markets. 
  Great efforts should be made to develop social insurance, 
environmental protection, and real estate that are oriented to 
guarantee and improve the lives of the people. Emphasis of this 
endeavor should be placed on unemployment insurance and 
retirement insurance. Positive efforts should be made to 
develop real estate trade, with focus on building residences. 
Attention should be paid to the pre-phase preparatory work for 
building 6 million square meters of residences for urban 
workers. We should positively develop environmental protection 
undertakings to resolve such problems, which exist in some urban 
and rural localities of the province, as environmental 
pollution, traffic jams, confused order, dirty surroundings, and 
poor service so as to constantly improve the living environment 
and living standards of the people. Tourism should develop with 
great efforts. This year, the foreign exchange revenue from 
tourism is projected at $14 million. 
  D. Investment in fixed assets should increase on a rational 
scale, and construction of key projects should be accelerated. 
  After endeavoring for several years, a number of large- and 
medium-sized capital construction and technological 
transformation projects of the province have been approved and 
decided by the state and construction of these projects will be 
started one by one. Within the tenure of office of the current 
government, efforts should be made to build or to complete the 
construction of the Beijing-Shijiazhuang (double width), 
Shijiazhuang-Taiyuan, and Shian highways. At the same time, the 
expansion of Berth 3-6 of Beijing-Tangshan Harbor and the 
Qinhuangdao Harbor should be accelerated. Construction of power 
plants should be continued to increase capacity. On the basis 
of reaching 1.29 million lines in the total capacity of urban 
and rural telephone exchanges last year, the total capacity of 
urban and rural telephone exchanges this year should reach 1.8 
million lines, or 2 million lines. In addition, a number of 
basic raw materials, basic facilities, and processing projects 
are under construction. The investment in fixed assets this 
year should increase through every possible means and should be 
set according to the capability of the province. The province 
should not only ensure the fulfillment of the set objectives but 
also ensure the basic balance between total supply and total 
demand. Efforts should also be made to attain or surpass the 
national average level in terms of the increase in fixed assets 
investment. The focus of the fixed asset investment should be 
placed on the readjustment of investment structure and on the 
optimization of investment orientation. By making full use of 
the province's advantages of having relatively more basic 
industries and basic facilities, Hebei should ensure on a 
priority basis the investment in the projects of agriculture, 
water conservation, energy resources, transportation, 
communications, and major raw materials, and should increase the 
investment in technological transformation, high and new 
technological, and precision and deep processing projects. At 
the same time, Hebei should increase a number of processing 
projects oriented to increasing the value that are much demanded 
on markets, require fewer fund investments and short 
construction period, and yield rapid returns from investment and 
good economic efficiency. At the same time, efforts should be 
made to incorporate these processing projects to the general 
construction plan of the state and the province. The general 
projects, whose economic efficiency is poor, whose construction 
funds have not been ensured, and that have no construction 
conditions, should be curbed resolutely to avoid duplicated and 
ill-planned projects. Energy should be concentrated on key 
construction projects. This year, Hebei Province has arranged, 
through screening, 158 key construction projects, 129 of which 
are the projects under continued construction, and should strive 
to obtain 13 projects whose construction will begin this year 
and 16 preparatory projects approved by the state. Attention 
should be paid to accelerating the building of the continued 
projects to ensure the completion and commission of 42 continued 
projects this year. The province should positively create 
conditions to win the state approval, as early as possible, of 
the two major construction projects, with one being the 
Shenhuang Land Port that is of strategic importance to Hebei's 
economic development and the other being the middle section of 
the project of diverting water from south to north. Continued 
efforts should be made to select good projects and do prephase 
preparatory work to ensure that the province's construction 
projects will not stop. The province should try every possible 
means to raise construction funds and open up more channels to 
raise and circulate money. We should strive to include some 
infrastructural projects compatible with the state's industrial 
policy in the total state construction plan and win the money 
support from the state policy-lending banks, various specialized 
banks, and other monetary institutions. Meanwhile, we should 
strive to raise funds from in and outside the province and 
actively and effectively use foreign capital. Banks and 
approved monetary institutions other than banks should fully 
develop their role in money lending to meet the needs of key 
construction projects. We should strengthen the management and 
coordination of key construction projects. We should strengthen 
the macro-regulation, control, and guidance of investment, apply 
the legal person responsibility system to key projects, and 
establish the mechanisms of risk-taking and restraint for new 
construction projects. We should strengthen the auditing and 
supervision of the use of funds and strictly keep the funds 
within the budget. While ensuring construction quality, we 
should strive to speed up the progress of construction to ensure 
all projects are started and commissioned early and yield 
benefits early. 
  E. We should actively develop the nonstate sectors of the 
economy to cultivate the new growing points of economic 
development. 
  We should adhere to the principle of developing the various 
sectors of the economy simultaneously while keeping the public 
sector predominant, and, while actively promoting the 
development of the state-owned economy, we should further adopt 
encouraging policies to develop the collective, individual, 
private, and foreign-funded economies. In developing the 
nonstate sectors of the economy, the key is that leaders at all 
levels should enhance understanding. They should take the 
"three advantages" as the criteria, eliminate the shackles of 
"leftist" ideas, conscientiously address the problem that the 
nonstate sectors "are discriminated against in policies and 
unfairly treated by the media, faced with levies of unwarranted 
fines, donations, and fees, and have no one to support them," 
treat all enterprises equally, and create a good social 
environment for the nonstate sectors to develop and to 
participate in market competition on an equal footing. We 
should include the development of the nonstate sectors of the 
economy in the local economic development plan and work out 
clear and specific targets. We should strengthen the management 
of the nonstate economies according to law and safeguard the 
legal rights and interests of the owners and managers of 
property. Meanwhile, we should actively give guidance to and 
exercise supervision over enterprises so that they will operate 
according to law, pay taxes according to regulations, and 
distribute interests in a rational manner. We should crack down 
on tax evasion, manipulation of the market, and other law 
breaches to promote the healthy development of the nonstate 
economies. 
  F. We should unswervingly implement the strategy of 
promotion 
through the export-oriented economy and open wider to foreign 
countries and domestic areas. 
  We should make the best use of the domestic and foreign 
markets, resources, and funds, speed up the connection with the 
international market, and implement the strategy of promotion 
through the export-oriented economy. This is an important way 
to develop the socialist market economy and also a significant 
change in Hebei's guiding thoughts for economic development and 
its work of opening to the outside world. To comply with this 
change, we should further emancipate our minds and have the 
courage and foresight to open wide, achieve great improvement, 
make major breakthroughs, and achieve large development. 
  We should pay attention to foreign trade, foreign funds, and 
foreign economic relations simultaneously and speed up their 
development. In exports, we should take advantage of the reform 
of the foreign trade system and stimulate the enthusiasm of all 
quarters to improve our capacity for earning foreign exchange 
through exports. We should adhere to the guiding thought that 
foreign trade should be developed by everyone and pool the 
efforts of the "four major armies." The provincial specialized 
import and export corporations should play their role as the 
major force to ensure the steady growth in exports. City and 
prefectural import and export corporations, enterprises with the 
decisionmaking power in export, and the three types of 
foreign-funded enterprises should achieve a rapid increase in 
exports. We should strive to reach the national average growth 
rates in ordinary trade, the export of the three types of 
foreign-funded enterprises, and barter trade and make Hebei's 
exports grow at the same pace with its gross national product. 
In using foreign capital, we should uphold the principle of 
giving simultaneous attention to large-, medium-sized, and small 
projects; to primary, secondary, and tertiary industries; to the 
efforts of the province, and various cities, prefectures, and 
counties; to various economic sectors, and to capital from Hong 
Kong, Macao, Taiwan, Overseas Chinese, and foreign countries; 
and actively broaden the channels and spheres in using foreign 
capital. We should strengthen external contacts, expand 
external propaganda, and regularize and standardize the work of 
inviting business and foreign capital. Through efforts, we 
should realize the goal of actually using $600 million in 
foreign capital this year, strive to make it reach $700 million, 
and build 700 three types of foreign-funded enterprises. In 
foreign economic and technological cooperation, we should 
achieve a big breakthrough this year. It is necessary to 
contract more labor services and construction projects abroad, 
actively support localities and enterprises with favorable 
conditions to export technology and equipment, establish 
enterprises abroad, and do business in foreign countries. 
Through the efforts of this year and next, we should realize 
the objective of "making the foreign economic business volume 
reach $10 million and exporting 10,000 laborers"; and this year 
we should make the foreign economic business volume reach $5 
million and the number of laborers working abroad reach 5,000. 
  We should continue to attend to places around Bohai, 
Beijing, and Tianjin. Our province has the two major advantages 
of being surrounded by Bohai Bay, Beijing, and Tianjin. If we 
do a good job in giving play to these two advantages, we will 
have great hope for accelerating Hebei's economic development. 
We should further enhance the sense of being "surrounded by 
Bohai Bay, Beijing, and Tianjin." The four cities of 
Qinhuangdao, Tangshan, Cangzhou, and Shijiazhuang cities located 
along Bohai Bay should actively organize people to implement the 
strategy on opening up and economic development which aims at 
"developing export-oriented economy to bring along the entire 
economy, combining the efforts of places around Bohai Bay, 
Beijing, and Tianjin, establishing cooperation at home, and 
making breakthroughs in introducing foreign capital," accelerate 
the pace to change the domestic-oriented economy into the 
export-oriented economy, achieve new breakthroughs in 
establishing and introducing large projects in the development 
zone, establish the due status of these cities in the economic 
zone around Bohai, and give play to their exemplary and 
radiation role in the whole province. All cities, prefectures, 
and counties should pay attention to places around Bohai, 
Beijing and Tianjin, formulate new measures, strive to develop 
a new sphere for developing Hebei by relying on Beijing and 
Tianjin, taking advantage of these two municipalities, and 
serving them, and grasp this work well until good results are 
achieved. This year Hebei plans to sign 1,100 domestic 
cooperative projects and introduce 2.3 billion yuan of funds and 
6,000 trained personnel from other provinces. 
  We should further improve the investment environment. 
Continued efforts should be made to improve the tangible 
conditions. This year, we should continue to expand the 
strength in making investments in communications, 
telecommunications, and power projects, strive to complete a 
number of key projects, and put them into use as early as 
possible. We should pay attention to improving the intangible 
conditions, further improve the system involving the management 
of foreign business firms, reduce and simplify procedures, raise 
efficiency, and improve service. It is necessary to strengthen 
management and service over three types of foreign-funded 
enterprises, manage things strictly in accordance with 
international practices, conscientiously implement the 
"joint-venture law," and help enterprises solve practical 
problems. We should strengthen the training and improvement of 
personnel dealing with foreign business and introduce and 
cultivate personnel for handling international economic and 
trade business activities in an effort to meet the needs of 
unceasingly expanding opening up and accelerating the 
export-oriented economy. 
<H5>  5. We Should Actively Develop Scientific, Technological, </H5>
Educational, and Cultural Undertakings 
  The development of scientific, technological, educational, 
and cultural undertakings is an important aspect in building an 
economically strong province, and an important guarantee for 
smoothly carrying out reform, opening up, and economic 
construction. While concentrating efforts on grasping economic 
construction, we should pay great attention to this work and 
actively reform and develop scientific, technological, 
educational, and cultural undertakings. 
  We should accelerate the pace of scientific and 
technological progress. The key in this regard lies in 
concentrating on "integrating science and technology with the 
economy" and "turning scientific and technological results into 
productive forces." By deepening the reform, we should 
establish or improve the mechanism of effectively integrating 
science and technology with the economy and accelerate the pace 
in commercializing the scientific and technological results and 
turning these results into practical productive forces. Efforts 
should be made to vigorously establish or improve the 
institutions in charge of scientific and technological 
development owned by enterprises. All large- and medium-sized 
enterprises across the province should create conditions for 
establishing as soon as possible their own scientific and 
technological development units; actively set up technical 
associations with the scientific research units and the higher 
educational institutions; and enforce the projects with joint 
efforts made by productive units (enterprises), schools (higher 
educational institutions), and research (scientific research 
institutes or units) to accelerate the integration between 
science, technology, and the economy. The work emphasis of this 
year will be placed on successfully establishing scientific and 
technological development units among 300 large- and 
medium-sized enterprises and building the internal technical 
progress mechanism of enterprises with the integration among 
markets, scientific research, and production to enable 
enterprises to possess stronger capabilities in technical 
development and transformation. 
  While continuously enhancing basic research, we should 
further reinforce the dynamics in applied research, technical 
development, and result popularization. In 1994 the province 
plans to manufacture or develop 1,100 new products at or above 
the provincial level. Of these products, over 40 percent of 
them will reach the domestic advanced level. It will study to 
develop 100 projects of new technologies at or above the 
provincial level. Of these technologies, over 60 percent of 
them will reach the domestic advanced level. The province will 
also do a good job in formulating 20 projects of assimilating 
the imported products and technologies and creating something 
new from them. By regarding as a target the integration between 
science, technology, and the economy, the province will do a 
good job in overcoming the scientific and technological 
difficulties among the 40 important and major research projects 
and among the 140 key projects; as well as in scoring the 
results with the domestic advanced level among the 100 projects. 
Efforts should be made to boldly develop privately owned 
scientific research units and to establish privately owned 
scientific and technological enterprises, scientific and 
technological enterprises owned by the state but operated by 
individuals, and the three types of foreign-funded enterprises 
in charge of scientific and technological research. The 
province will accelerate the pace in building the state-level 
high and new technology industrial development zones of 
Shijiazhuang and Baoding and select areas for building 12 
provincial high and new-technology industrial parks. We should 
concentrate our efforts on successfully conducting the key work 
in building these parks. Efforts should be made to accelerate 
the development of high and new technologies and high and new 
technology industries. In 1994 the province's number of high and 
new technology enterprises appraised as qualified will reach 350 
and that of high and new technology products will reach 550. We 
should earnestly implement the principle of "opening up, 
invigorating, supporting, and guiding" to establish the open 
systems of technological markets. Based on continuously 
improving the provincial level technological markets, we should 
do a good job in emphatically establishing permanent 
technological markets. 
  We should accelerate the development of educational 
undertakings. In conducting the education work, we should 
earnestly implement "China's outline on educational reform and 
development"; deepen the reform in the educational systems; and 
readjust the educational structure. We should also upgrade the 
teaching quality and schooling efficiency and vigorously train 
the talented personnel of various kinds, who are able to meet 
the demands of developing the socialist market economy. Efforts 
should be made to accelerate the enforcement of nine-year 
compulsory education. In enforcing compulsory education, we 
should chiefly have the schools operate with the state 
investment; encourage the social fund raising to be made through 
multiple channels and styles and local people to operate 
schools; and foster a new system with the integration between 
most schools being run by the government and social 
participation in schooling being realized. A good job should be 
continuously done in grasping the "educational project of hope" 
and realistically resolve the problem of the school-age children 
in rural areas being unable to enter schools. Efforts should be 
made to consolidate, upgrade, and perfect the secondary 
vocational and technical education and the adult education. We 
should actively push forward the comprehensive reform in rural 
education and enforce overall arrangements among agriculture, 
science, and education. In 1994 the province will concentrate 
its efforts on building 100 vocational education centers at the 
county level. A good job will be continuously done in 
eliminating illiteracy among youths. In conducting the higher 
education, efforts should be made to grasp the projects 
including the strong points of higher educational institutions; 
to create research results with competitive capability; to turn 
out highly sophisticated technologies; and to train outstanding 
and qualified talented personnel for serving economic 
construction and social development. We should positively and 
steadily readjust the specialized course of institutions of 
higher learning. Through appropriate amalgamation, we should 
expand the scale of institutions of higher learning and upgrade 
the efficiency in running schools. We should positively 
organize forces to strive to join the implementation of the 
state "211-project" plan and attend to the construction of two 
key universities and 50 major branches of learning. On the 
premise of taking teaching as a key link, we should vigorously 
strengthen scientific research so as to further suit the demands 
for upgrading the teaching quality and serving the economic 
construction. It is necessary to stabilize the scale of 
recruiting students for universities and secondary specialized 
schools. This year, ordinary institutions of higher learning 
should recruit 36,000 students and secondary specialized schools 
should recruit 75,000 students. We should conscientiously 
implement the "law governing teachers" and realistically 
safeguard the legal rights and benefits of teachers. We should 
strive to set up and maintain a teacher contingents with high 
political integrity, high professional abilities, and a strong 
spirit of respecting the professional work. We should 
realistically solve teachers' wage, housing, and training 
problems; stabilize the teacher contingents; and promote the 
overall provincial educational level to a new height. 
  It is necessary to promote the prosperity of the socialist 
cultural undertakings. We should persist in the orientation of 
making literature and art serve socialism and the people and the 
principle of letting a hundred flowers blossom and a hundred 
schools of thought contend, carry forward the main melody, 
advocate a variety of artistic styles, and persistently attach 
primary importance to social benefits. On this prerequisite, we 
should unify economic results with social benefits. We should 
positively promote the reform and setup of the cultural system, 
make efforts to create outstanding skilled persons and 
outstanding artistic works, strive to create and upgrade 
"Yanzhao art" with Hebei's special characteristics, and provide 
the people with the spiritual food of healthful and colorful 
contents. The press and publication and radio and television 
departments should prominently propagate reform, opening up, and 
economic construction; press close to reality, life, and the 
people; ceaselessly upgrade the effect of propaganda; and expand 
the scale of propaganda. We should vigorously develop the mass 
cultural undertakings; collect funds from all fronts to 
accelerate, in a well-planned manner and in the order of 
importance, the construction of such cultural facilities as 
cultural centers, libraries, scientific and technological 
centers, museums, archives, and gymnasiums; add grass-roots 
scientific and technological and cultural centers; and launch 
cultural activities within enterprises, neighborhood committees, 
campuses, villages, and towns so as to satisfy the people's 
increasing higher cultural and entertainment demands. It is 
necessary to strengthen the management of cultural markets and 
ensure the sound development of cultural markets. We should 
protect, develop, and use cultural relics according to laws. 
  It is necessary to develop public health and sports 
undertakings. We should persist in the principle of putting 
prevention first in medical work and pay attention to and 
strengthen the prevention and cure of the diseases that 
seriously harm the health of the people. This year, we should 
continue to carry out, on a trial basis, the medical insurance 
system in the urban areas; develop the rural cooperative medical 
treatment system; and set up perfect county, township, and 
village medical treatment networks. We should strengthen the 
education on medical ethics among the medical units at various 
levels; vigorously carry forward the spirit of wholeheartedly 
serving the people, saving the dead, and supporting the injured; 
resolutely correct the unhealthy trends within various trades; 
and strive to upgrade the medical and technological levels and 
service quality. We should persist in the principle of paying 
equal attention to popularizing and improving sports activities 
and positively explore ways for reforming the sports management 
system in the new situation. At the time of implementing the 
"state all- people health plan" and vigorously popularizing mass 
sports activities, we should grasp our strong items, cultivate 
outstanding athletes for our province, and upgrade Hebei's 
sports competition levels. 
<H5>  6. We Should Realistically Strengthen Spiritual </H5>
Civilization, Democracy, and the Legal System 
  In the progress of reform, opening up, and socialist 
modernization, we must always uphold the principle of "taking a 
two-handed approach and be tough with both" and attach prime 
importance to realistically strengthening socialist spiritual 
civilization, democracy, and the legal system. 
  We should conscientiously attend to ideological and 
political 
construction under the socialist market economic conditions. It 
is necessary to persist in using Comrade Deng Xiaoping's theory 
on building socialism with Chinese characteristics to unify the 
ideology and understanding of the broad masses of cadres, using 
scientific theory to arm the people, correct public opinions to 
guide the people, noble spirit to mold the people, and 
outstanding works to encourage the people. We should deeply and 
realistically organize the study of volume no.3 of the "Selected 
Works of Deng Xiaoping," urge the higher and the lower levels 
across the province to unceasingly emancipate the mind, renew 
concepts, and enhance the consciousness and steadfastness of the 
broad masses of cadres in unswervingly implementing the party's 
basic line. We should persist in using correct public opinions 
as the guidance, guide the broad masses of cadres to improve 
relations in reform and to support and participate in reform. 
It is necessary to strengthen education on pioneering 
undertakings with painstaking efforts during the new period, 
actively conduct all forms of education on patriotism, 
collectivism, and socialism, promote healthy trends among the 
people, and strengthen their cohesion. The correct outlook on 
life, the concept on value, and the civilized and healthy way of 
living should be upheld, and money worshipping, out-and-out 
egoism, and all sorts of decadent ideologies should be 
resolutely resisted and opposed. Further efforts should be made 
to strengthen education on professional ethics and social 
morality, adopt clear-cut stand to support justice, deal blows 
to unhealthy trends, and form a good social habit of conducting 
healthy activities to scale the heights and making progress 
actively. 
  We should earnestly promote socialist democracy. It is 
necessary to always pay attention to safeguarding the right of 
the broad masses of people of being masters of their own 
destiny, extensively mobilize and rely on the masses, and give 
full play to, safeguard, and guide the enthusiasm of the broad 
masses of people. Governments at all levels should respect the 
people's congresses, the people's congress standing committees, 
and the deputies to exercise their functions and powers in line 
with law and consciously receive legal supervision and work 
supervision from the people's congresses. We should pay 
attention to giving play to the role of the CPPCC committees, 
democratic parties, nonparty patriotic persons, and mass 
organizations in political consultation and democratic 
supervision and conscientiously listen to their opinions and 
suggestions while making major policy decisions. It is 
necessary to conscientiously handle all proposals and 
suggestions raised by deputies and the motions raised by the 
CPPCC committee; further establish and improve the system and 
procedures in making policy decisions and giving supervision 
democratically so that all policy decisions are made in a 
scientific, democratic, and legal manner. We should actively 
strengthen democracy in the grass roots, give full play to the 
role of workers' congresses, neighborhood committees, and 
villagers' committees, and guarantee that the grass-roots people 
can fully exercise their democratic power. 
  We should pay great attention to socialist legal system. To 
build and improve the socialist market economic structure, we 
must have a perfect legal system as a guarantee for keeping the 
activities within a proper bound. We should step up efforts to 
formulate laws and regulations to keep the market activities 
within proper bound, to safeguard the market economic order, to 
improve macroeconomic regulation and control, and to perfect 
social security, establish and improve laws and regulations, 
conscientiously perform administrative work in line with law, 
and use more economic and legal means to organize, guide, and 
manage economic activities and social affairs. We should 
strengthen inspection and supervision over law enforcement and 
resolutely resolve the problems of failing to observe the laws 
that are enacted and to strictly enforce laws and regulations, 
and using one's words to replace laws and one's power to bend 
the law. Continued efforts should be made to deeply develop the 
"second five-year plan to disseminate law knowledge," and 
enhance the legal concept of the broad masses of people. We 
should further strengthen the legal service and the legal 
guaranteeing functions of judicial and administrative organs at 
all levels and make more contributions to accelerating reform, 
opening up, and the development of the socialist market economy. 
  The comprehensive management of social order should be 
strengthened. We should be highly vigilant against and deal 
resolute blows to the sabotages conducted by hostile forces and 
hostile elements at home and abroad. The campaign of dealing 
severe blows to crimes should be launched continuously and 
profoundly, and forces should be organized in a timely manner to 
deal blows to crimes. All sorts of serious criminal and 
economic cases should be investigated and cracked rapidly and 
should be punished according to law as severely and promptly as 
possible. All criminal cliques, the cliques with the nature of 
underworld society in particular, and all the hooligans and 
criminals who jeopardize public security, should be stricken 
voluntarily and be eliminated resolutely. Even more resolute 
measures should be adopted to wipe out pornographic books and 
articles, to strike human abduction, and to eliminate the "six 
social vices." Efforts should be made to wipe out all ugly 
social phenomena, resolutely investigate and ban all sorts of 
unlawful behaviors, such as manufacturing and selling of obscene 
articles, prostitution, visits to whores, gambling parties, and 
obscene service. Meanwhile, severe blows should be dealt to 
those who abduct and sell women and children. We should 
continuously strengthen the building of basic and grass-roots 
public security organs, give full play to the role of all mass 
autonomous organizations, such as the social order maintenance 
organs at the grass-roots level and the people mediation organs, 
establish and perfect the socialized security guarding 
mechanism, comprehensively implement various measures and 
responsibility system concerning comprehensive management of 
public security, mobilize the forces in all fields of society to 
maintain social order altogether in order to create a fine 
social order. 
  The activities of supporting the army, giving preferential 
treatment to family members of revolutionary martyrs and 
servicemen, supporting the government, and cherishing the people 
should be launched in a profound way, and the building of the 
army should be supported positively. 
  We should continue to consolidate and develop the province's 
excellent situation characterized with army-government unity and 
army-people unity in order to promote the in-depth development 
of the "double-support" activities. We should profoundly launch 
the activities of the army and the people or the police and the 
people making concerted efforts to build spiritual civilization 
and to create "double support" model cities and counties in 
order to create even more "double support" model units. 
Governments at all levels should enthusiastically show concern 
for and support army building and should actually help the army 
resolve the problems with regard to the training oriented to 
preparations against war and to the construction of national 
defense projects. Governments at all levels should also do a 
good job in receiving retired army cadres, giving special care 
to disabled servicemen and to family members of revolutionary 
martyrs and servicemen, and providing jobs for demobilized 
soldiers. We should further enhance the national defense 
concept of the vast numbers of cadres and the masses. 
  The nationality and religious work should be improved. The 
nationalities policies and religious policies of the party and 
the state should be carried out conscientiously. Great efforts 
should be made to promote and support the development of the 
economy and all other undertakings of minority nationalities 
areas. The unity among various nationalities should be 
enhanced, the culture of various nationalities should be carried 
forward, and efforts should be made to train cadres of various 
nationalities. The system of national regional autonomy should 
be upheld and improved, the customs and habits of all minority 
nationalities should be respected, and the socialist relations 
among all nationalities should be consolidated. The legal 
management of religious affairs should be strengthened, normal 
religious activities should be protected, and the activities of 
utilizing religion to commit crimes should be stopped and dealt 
with according to law. 
  Fellow Deputies! 
  Opposing corruption, strengthening administrative honesty 
and 
diligence of governments at all levels, and resolutely 
struggling against all sorts of corrupt phenomena are a 
fundamental task for the building of political powers at all 
levels as well as a major guarantee for the smooth progress of 
reform, opening up, and economic development. Governments at 
all levels should fully understand the long-duration and 
arduousness of the anti-corruption campaign and should carry 
this campaign through to the end. All state functionaries, 
leading cadres in particular, should keep firmly in mind that 
the powers in their hands are invested on them by the people and 
all the behaviors of abusing one's powers to seek personal gain 
are against the will of the people, adversely affect the 
prestige of the party and the government among the masses and 
destroy the flesh-and-blood relations between the party, the 
government, and the people. Therefore, our cadres at all levels 
should take the initiative in remaining clean and honest in 
performing official duties, be diligent to work for the people, 
and serve the people wholeheartedly. We should make further 
efforts to address the problems about which the masses have many 
complaints. We should step up establishment of effective 
mechanisms for supervision and restraint, fully develop the 
supervisory role of the laws, organizations, masses, and the 
media, continue to investigate and handle the serious cases on 
embezzlement, bribery, dereliction of duty, and sternly punish 
corrupt elements. We should make continuous efforts to check 
the unhealthy trends of abusing power for extortion, swindling, 
trampling upon others, telling lies, making false achievement 
reports, making false accounts, and producing fake and inferior 
commodities. In the struggle against corruption, we should 
correctly handle the relations between the anticorruption 
struggle and economic construction, be firm in promoting reform, 
opening up, and the socialist market economy, be firm in 
opposing corruption, advocating honesty, and cracking down on 
crimes, and continuously push forward the endeavor of opposing 
corruption and advocating honesty, reform, opening up, and the 
modernization drive. 
  We should actively facilitate the reform of the 
administrative system and the organizational reform and 
accelerate the transformation of the government functions. In 
line with the guidelines of the 14th party congress and the 
first session of the eighth NPC, Hebei's organizational reform 
should be by and large completed by the end of 1995 and the 
popularization of the public service system should be by and 
large completed by the end of 1996. Based on the principle of 
streamlining organizations, changing functions, bringing the 
relations between various sectors into better balance, promoting 
development, and ensuring stability and the general idea of 
diverting personnel after determining the functions, the setup, 
and the staff of organizations and then establishing the public 
service system, we should first carry out the reform of the 
provincial-level organizations and then promote the reform at 
the city, prefectural, county, and township levels in a planned 
and orderly manner. Governments at all levels should strengthen 
the organization and leadership of this work, conscientiously 
carry out ideological and political work, and educate the vast 
number of office personnel to have the cardinal principles in 
mind, take the overall situation into account, correctly treat 
the organizational reform, remove the ideological obstacles, 
stabilize their feelings, and ensure the smooth progress of the 
organizational reform and the normal operation of the office 
work. Through the organizational reform, we should gradually 
establish an administrative system that suits the needs of the 
development of the socialist market economy and build a compact, 
highly trained, honest, highly efficient, and vigorous 
contingent of public servants. 
  We should attach great importance to and properly handle the 
contradictions among the people and earnestly show concern for 
people's life. Following the continuous deepening of reform, 
various types of contradictions among the people may be 
reflected in complicated forms. We should conduct ideological 
education, give policy guidance, adjust the interests between 
various sectors, and adjudicate according to law to properly 
address the issues concerning the vital interests of the masses 
and the sensitive hot issues, eliminate the destabilizing 
factors in a timely manner, and consolidate and develop the 
stable and united political situation. We should earnestly give 
heed to people's petitions and maintain close ties with them. 
Governments at all levels should always be concerned with the 
well-being of the masses, especially the supplies of fuel, rice, 
oil, salt, soy sauce, vinegar, and vegetables to them, to ensure 
the supplies of daily necessities and the distribution of wages 
to teachers, cadres, and workers on time. We should 
conscientiously do a good job in helping the poor and disaster 
relief. We should adopt all necessary measures to help resolve 
the difficulties in the production and life of difficult 
enterprises and people of disaster areas. We should create a 
stable social environment for reform and development through 
various work. 
  We should exert great efforts to improve leadership style, 
seek truth, deal with concrete matters relating to work, and do 
solid work. According to Comrade Jiang Zemin's recent 
requirements for "concentrating more time, having less social 
intercourse, conducting more investigation and study activities, 
having less subjectivism, doing more concrete deeds, and 
indulging in less empty talks," we should strive to make 
noticeable progress in improving the leadership style. It is 
necessary to vigorously advocate the style of study. The 
leading cadres at various levels should take the lead in 
studying the third volume of the "Selected Works of Deng 
Xiaoping" and the CPC Central Committee's "decision on several 
issues relating to the setup of the socialist market economic 
system," strive to grasp the new knowledge concerning the 
market economy, study the new measures for promoting the 
economic development, master the new methods for solving various 
contradictions and problems cropping up during economic 
operation, upgrade the abilities in organizing and leading the 
socialist market economy, and enhance the foresight, initiative, 
and creativeness of the work. We should adopt various forms to 
give trainings at different levels, in groups, and by stages so 
as to make the broad masses of the cadres' ideas and work 
methods suit the changes from the planned economy to the market 
economy. It is necessary to vigorously advocate the practice of 
investigation and study. We should persist in materialist 
dialectics, avoid lopsidedness and formalism, and overcome 
subjectivism and bureaucracy. The leading cadres at various 
levels should often go deep to the grass roots, the masses, and 
the reality to conduct more investigation and study activities 
and help solve problems and to timely discover, sum up, and 
popularize the masses' creativeness and experiences. The 
government leaders at the provincial, city, and county levels 
should make division of work, keep contacts with the units that 
they should assume responsibility for their reform work, grasp 
typical cases, and sum up experiences, and promote the work of 
the overall situation. It is necessary to vigorously advocate 
the practice of doing solid work. The working personnel of the 
governments at various levels should firmly foster the idea of 
doing solid work to rejuvenate the province and make the 
province strong, have the spirit of holding themselves 
responsible to the party and the people, create achievements, 
and make new changes in the appearances of their localities, 
departments, and units in the new situation. We should further 
perfect the system of responsibility for management of fixed 
tasks and perfect the cadre encouragement and restriction 
mechanisms. The cadres with outstanding achievements and those 
who are among the best within their trades and departments 
should be commended. Those who make slow progress in their 
work; those whose development speed, progress levels, and work 
seating arrangements lag behind the national average levels; and 
those who fail to make progress or even lag behind for several 
years should be encouraged to change their appearances. We 
should resolutely readjust the leading bodies and cadres that 
fail to improve their work, seriously create disunity, indulge 
themselves in unhealthy practice, accumulate the problems, 
engage themselves in the "fake and unqualified" activities in 
their leadership work, are involved in serious problems, and 
produce bad influences. We should vigorously advocate the 
practice of doing solid work and striving to create quality 
achievements and further speed up the pace of reform, opening 
up, and building Hebei into an economically powerful province. 
  Fellow Deputies: 
  We are now in an extremely important historical period. Time 
is advancing and the situation is developing. Our fighting 
strides cannot be obstructed by any difficulties and obstacles 
in the course of advance. Under the leadership of the party 
Central Committee, the State Council, and the provincial party 
committee, we should firmly grasp the historical favorable 
opportunities, unite as one, keep forging ahead, arduously do 
pioneering work, and make unswerving efforts to advance toward 
the target of building Hebei into an economically powerful 
province. 

